Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4305
Risk management pool; powers.

(1) Any risk management pool organized pursuant to the Intergovernmental Risk Management Act, whether or not a body corporate, shall have the power to sue and be sued, make contracts, hold and dispose of real and personal property, borrow money, contract debt, and pledge any pool assets in the name of the pool.

(2) The power to make contracts prescribed in subsection (1) of this section shall specifically include the power to establish the risk management pool as a separate legal or administrative entity.

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 5.